Colorado, session 2026A, SB019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26.5-2-106 as
follows:
26.5-2-106. Repeal of part.
THIS PART 1 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 26.5-2-202 as
follows:
26.5-2-202. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS" MEANS THE ACCOUNTABILITY
METRICS INCLUDED IN AN AGREEMENT TO MEASURE A COUNCIL'S
PERFORMANCE.
(2) "AGREEMENT" MEANS THE AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-2-206 THAT THE DEPARTMENT ENTERS INTO
WITH AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL AND THAT CONTAINS A SCOPE OF
WORK AND ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS.
(3) "COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN" MEANS A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN
DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-2-204 TO ADDRESS THE EARLY
CHILDHOOD NEEDS IN A DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA.
(1) (4) "Council" or "early childhood council" means an early
childhood council identified or established locally in communities
throughout the state pursuant to section 26.5-2-203 or 26.5-5-102 for the
purpose of developing and ultimately implementing a comprehensive
system of early childhood services to ensure the school readiness of children
five years of age or younger UNDER SIX YEARS OLD in the community.
(2) (5) "County department" means the county or district department
of human or social services.
(6) "EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAM" MEANS
ANY PROGRAM ACROSS DISCIPLINES THAT SERVES CHILDREN UNDER SIX
YEARS OLD AND THEIR FAMILIES.
(3) (7) "Early childhood education program" means a child care
program licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 that
provides child care and education to children five years of age or younger
UNDER SIX YEARS OLD.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-019

(4) (8) "Fund" means the early childhood cash fund created in
section 26.5-2-209 (1).
(9) "MIXED DELIVERY SYSTEM" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 26.5-4-203.
(10) "PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN" MEANS A PLAN
DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-2-208.5 THAT
AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL MUST IMPLEMENT IF THE COUNCIL IS NOT
MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SCOPE OF WORK AND ACCOUNTABILITY
METRICS CONTAINED IN THE AGREEMENT.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-2-203, amend (1)
as follows:
26.5-2-203. Early childhood councils - established - rules.
(1) There is established a statewide integrated system of early
childhood councils to COORDINATE, improve, and sustain the availability,
accessibility, capacity, and quality of COMPREHENSIVE early childhood
services for children and families throughout the state. The councils have
consistent function and structure statewide and are governed by the
department with input, cooperation, and support services from the
departments DEPARTMENT of human services, INCLUDING THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION, AND THE DEPARTMENTS OF HIGHER EDUCATION,
HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, education, and public health and
environment.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-2-204, add (4.5)
as follows:
26.5-2-204. Early childhood councils - applications - community
strategic plans - rules.
(4.5) (a) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, A COMMUNITY
STRATEGIC PLAN DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION
MUST FOSTER ACCESS FOR FAMILIES TO, AND ROBUST PARTICIPATION BY
PROVIDERS IN, EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES AND MUST ADDRESS ACCESSIBILITY AND QUALITY IMPROVEMENTS
THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE EARLY CHILDHOOD COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-019

FRAMEWORK.
(b) THE COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE COUNCIL WILL ASSIST FAMILIES IN
ACCESSING REFERRALS AND RESOURCES FOR EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION,
IN APPLYING FOR EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES, AND IN ENROLLING CHILDREN WITH EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION
PROVIDERS;
(II) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE COUNCIL WILL COORDINATE WITH
OTHER ENTITIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, OTHER COUNCILS,
COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SCHOOL DISTRICTS, LOCAL AND REGIONAL SERVICE
PROVIDERS, AND TRIBAL AGENCIES TO INTEGRATE OUTREACH EFFORTS;
(III) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE COUNCIL WILL RECRUIT AND
COORDINATE WITH PROVIDERS TO ENSURE THAT FAMILIES CAN CHOOSE
AMONG PROVIDERS, WITHIN THE MIXED DELIVERY SYSTEM IN THE COUNCIL'S
SERVICE AREA, THAT PARTICIPATE IN PUBLICLY FUNDED PROGRAMS,
INCLUDING THE COLORADO UNIVERSAL PRESCHOOL PROGRAM AND THE
COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND
(IV) A PLAN FOR FACILITATING ACCESS TO WORKFORCE TRAINING
AND EDUCATION FOR SERVICE PROVIDERS AND FOR IDENTIFYING AND
IMPLEMENTING RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION STRATEGIES.
(c) THE COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN MAY INCLUDE:
(I) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE COUNCIL WILL FACILITATE ACCESS TO
EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND HOLISTIC
SERVICES THAT INCLUDE FOOD, CASH ASSISTANCE, HEALTH CARE, AND
COUNTY CHILD WELFARE SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-5-101,
INCLUDING IMPLEMENTATION OF THE FEDERAL "FAMILY FIRST PREVENTION
SERVICES ACT OF 2018"; AND
(II) THE COUNCIL'S STRATEGIES FOR IDENTIFYING AND SECURING, AS
FEASIBLE, ADDITIONAL LOCAL RESOURCES AND FUNDING TO SUPPORT EARLY
CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND SERVICES IN THE
COMMUNITY.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-019

SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-2-206, amend
(1)(f); repeal (1)(c); and add (2), (3), (4), and (5) as follows:
26.5-2-206. Early childhood councils - duties.
(1) Each early childhood council has, at a minimum, the following
duties and functions:
(c) To establish a local system of accountability to measure local
progress based on the needs and goals set for program performance;
(f) To develop and implement a COMMUNITY strategic plan as
described in section 26.5-2-204 (4), including a comprehensive evaluation
and report SECTION 26.5-2-204 AND REGULARLY SHARE INFORMATION
ABOUT PROGRESS ON ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS WITH THE DEPARTMENT;
and
(2) (a) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, A COUNCIL, IN
PARTNERSHIP WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL CREATE A SCOPE OF WORK FOR
THE COUNCIL AND ANNUALLY REVIEW THE SCOPE OF WORK AND REVISE IT IF
NECESSARY.
(b) CONTEMPORANEOUSLY WITH REVIEWING THE SCOPE OF WORK,
THE COUNCIL, IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL ANNUALLY
REVIEW ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS ASSOCIATED WITH THE SCOPE OF WORK,
AND REVISE THEM IF NECESSARY, TO ENSURE THEY ALIGN WITH THE REVISED
SCOPE OF WORK.
(3) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, EACH COUNCIL SHALL,
CONSISTENT WITH THE COUNCIL'S SCOPE OF WORK, IMPLEMENT ITS
COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN.
(4) EACH COUNCIL SHALL:
(a) SUPPORT THE AVAILABILITY OF HIGH-QUALITY EARLY CHILDHOOD
CARE AND EDUCATION FOR ALL CHILDREN, INCLUDING SUPPORTING ACCESS
TO TRAINING AND SUPPORT FOR MEMBERS OF THE EARLY CHILDHOOD
WORKFORCE IN ALL SETTINGS, INCLUDING INFORMAL OR LICENSE-EXEMPT
PROVIDERS;
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-019

(b) MONITOR THE AVAILABILITY OF HIGH-QUALITY EARLY CHILD
CARE AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS WITHIN THE COMMUNITY, AND, AS
APPROPRIATE, WORK TO INCREASE THAT AVAILABILITY OVER TIME TO
BETTER MEET FAMILY AND COMMUNITY NEEDS;
(c) SUPPORT PUBLIC AND PRIVATE PROVIDERS IN RECRUITING,
DEVELOPING, AND RETAINING WITHIN THE COMMUNITY A QUALITY EARLY
CHILDHOOD WORKFORCE;
(d) WORK WITH PROVIDERS IN THE COMMUNITY AND ENTER INTO
DATA-SHARING AGREEMENTS AS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THE COLLECTION
AND REPORTING OF ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS TO THE DEPARTMENT, AS
REQUIRED BY DEPARTMENT RULES, IN A MANNER THAT MINIMIZES
DUPLICATION AND THE BURDEN ON FAMILIES AND PROVIDERS AND ENSURES
COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE DATA PRIVACY AND SECURITY
PROTECTIONS;
(e) WORK IN COORDINATION WITH COUNTY DEPARTMENTS AND
TRIBAL AGENCIES AND LOCAL COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS TO
INTEGRATE OUTREACH FOR EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES WITH OTHER EFFORTS TO PROVIDE HOLISTIC
SERVICES FOR FAMILIES, INCLUDING FOOD, CASH ASSISTANCE, AND HEALTH
CARE;
(f) COMPLY WITH DEPARTMENT RULES, IF ANY, IN IMPLEMENTING
THE COUNCIL'S COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN AND CARRYING OUT THE
COUNCIL'S DUTIES;
(g) COMPLY WITH ANY STATUTORY AUDITING REQUIREMENTS THAT
APPLY TO THE COUNCIL OR, IF THE COUNCIL IS NOT OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY
STATUTE TO UNDERGO AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL AUDIT, CONTRACT FOR THE
PERFORMANCE OF AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL AUDIT OR FINANCIAL REVIEW OF
THE OPERATIONS OF THE COUNCIL BY AN INDEPENDENT AUDITOR; AND
(h) COMPLY WITH ANY OTHER PROVISIONS INCLUDED IN THE
AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BETWEEN THE COUNCIL AND THE DEPARTMENT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) TO SUPPORT PARTNERSHIP AND MUTUAL ACCOUNTABILITY
BETWEEN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS AND THE DEPARTMENT, THE
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-019

DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(a) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH EACH EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCIL THAT IS BASED ON THE COUNCIL'S COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN
AND DEPARTMENT GOALS AND THAT SPECIFIES THE RESPECTIVE DUTIES OF
THE EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL AND THE DEPARTMENT IN IMPLEMENTING
THE COUNCIL'S COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN. AN AGREEMENT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE "PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES
101 TO 112 OF TITLE 24. THE TERM OF THE INITIAL AGREEMENT FOR AN
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL IS THREE YEARS, AND SUBSEQUENT
AGREEMENTS MUST HAVE TERMS OF AT LEAST THREE BUT NOT MORE THAN
FIVE YEARS, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE AGREEMENT, AT A
MINIMUM, MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A SCOPE OF WORK FOR THE COUNCIL CREATED IN PARTNERSHIP
WITH THE COUNCIL THAT IS RESPONSIVE TO LOCAL COMMUNITY NEEDS;
CONTRIBUTES TO COLLECTIVE OUTCOMES; PROMOTES THE SHARED GOALS OF
THE EARLY CHILDHOOD COLORADO FRAMEWORK AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD'S STATEWIDE STRATEGIC PLAN; AND REFLECTS
EXPECTATIONS, TARGETS, AND ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS, IN ALIGNMENT
WITH THE COUNCIL'S COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN AND STATEWIDE GOALS
FOR THE PROVISION OF EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS
AND SERVICES IN COLORADO, TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION AVAILABLE
APPROPRIATIONS; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF ANY PAYMENT THAT THE COUNCIL RECEIVES
FROM THE DEPARTMENT TO COVER INDIRECT COSTS DURING THE TERM OF
THE AGREEMENT.
(b) DISTRIBUTE AND ADMINISTER PUBLIC FUNDING FOR EARLY
CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH AGREEMENTS AND IN COORDINATION WITH LOCAL AND
TRIBAL AGENCIES, WHEN APPLICABLE; EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT MAY
DELEGATE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE RESPONSIBILITY FOR DISTRIBUTING AND
ADMINISTERING PUBLIC FUNDING TO A COUNCIL THROUGH THE COUNCIL'S
AGREEMENT;
(c) SUPPORT EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS BY PROVIDING FUNDING,
TRAINING, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING TRAINING AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE USE OF REQUIRED TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS,
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-019

REGULAR AND AS-NEEDED COLLABORATIVE SUPPORT, AND, WHERE FEASIBLE,
ASSISTANCE IN IMPLEMENTING COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLANS;
(d) IDENTIFY SUCCESSFUL STRATEGIES AND INNOVATIONS
IMPLEMENTED BY EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS THROUGHOUT THE STATE
AND PROVIDE INFORMATION, BY POSTING INFORMATION ON THE
DEPARTMENT WEBSITE OR BY ANOTHER MEANS, TO ASSIST EARLY
CHILDHOOD COUNCILS IN REPLICATING AND ADAPTING THE STRATEGIES AND
INNOVATIONS IN THEIR COMMUNITIES; AND
(e) COMMIT TO WORKING WITH EACH EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL IN
PARTNERSHIP TO DELIVER SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES. THE
DEPARTMENT'S COMMITMENTS IN THE PARTNERSHIP INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT
LIMITED TO:
(I) CLEAR AND FREQUENT COMMUNICATION, INCLUDING REGULAR
RECOMMENDATIONS TO SUPPORT THE SMOOTH FUNCTIONING OF THE
PARTNERSHIP;
(II) TIMELY RESOLUTION OF ISSUES AND DISPUTES;
(III) MAINTAINING A CLEAR CHAIN OF COMMAND THAT OFFERS A
COUNCIL OPPORTUNITIES TO CONNECT DIRECTLY WITH PROGRAM
SPECIALISTS AND DEPARTMENT LEADERSHIP; AND
(IV) MAINTAINING TIMELY CONTRACTING, INVOICING, AND
REIMBURSEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-2-207, amend (1),
(2)(a), and (2)(b); and add (3) as follows:
26.5-2-207. Early childhood councils - waivers - rules - funding
- application.
(1) (a) A local council may request a waiver of any rule that would
prevent a council from implementing council projects IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE COUNCIL'S COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN. The local council shall submit
the request to the early childhood leadership commission created in part 3
of article 1 of this title 26.5. The early childhood leadership commission
shall consult with the affected state agency in reviewing the request. The
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-019

department or other affected state agency DEPARTMENT. THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR shall grant waivers upon recommendation by the commission
DEPARTMENT.
(b) IF A COUNCIL'S WAIVER REQUEST FALLS OUTSIDE THE PURVIEW
OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIGN A LIAISON TO
CONSULT WITH THE AFFECTED STATE AGENCY.
(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL ESTABLISH BY RULE THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE WAIVER PROCESS, INCLUDING THE FORMAT AND
CONTENT OF A COUNCIL'S WAIVER REQUEST, THE CRITERIA FOR THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO GRANT A REQUEST TO WAIVE A DEPARTMENT RULE,
AND ASSOCIATED TIMELINES.
(2) (a) The executive director shall promulgate ADOPT rules to
develop and distribute to councils the application form and application
process to be used by each council seeking to receive council infrastructure,
quality improvement, AND technical assistance and evaluation funding from
the early childhood cash fund created in section 26.5-2-209 and other
funding sources appropriated for early childhood services.
(b) The department shall, upon receipt, review applications for early
childhood funding from the early childhood cash fund established in section
26.5-2-209 and other funding sources FROM MONEY appropriated FROM
OTHER SOURCES for early childhood services.
(3) THE RULES MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT THE AGREEMENT
TERMINATION PROCESS, APPLICATION PROCESS, AND ASSOCIATED TIMELINES
IF A COUNTY RECONFIGURES OR DESIGNATES A NEW CONVENING ENTITY.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26.5-2-208.5 as
follows:
26.5-2-208.5. Early childhood councils - performance review and
accountability - rules - report.
(1) (a) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL ADOPT RULES ESTABLISHING
A PROCESS THAT SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION TO REVIEW
THE PERFORMANCE OF EACH COUNCIL. BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE JULY 1,
2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IMPLEMENT THE REVIEW PROCESS
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-019

ESTABLISHED IN RULE BY WHICH THE DEPARTMENT AT LEAST ANNUALLY
REVIEWS THE PERFORMANCE OF EACH COUNCIL IN SERVING THE COUNCIL'S
COMMUNITY, INCLUDING IMPLEMENTING THE APPROVED COMMUNITY
STRATEGIC PLAN AND SCOPE OF WORK. DURING THE REVIEW PROCESS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) REVIEW THE COUNCIL'S PERFORMANCE UNDER THE AGREEMENT
USING THE ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS ESTABLISHED WITH THE SCOPE OF
WORK; AND
(II) AT INTERVALS RANGING FROM THREE TO FIVE YEARS, AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, SOLICIT INPUT FROM FAMILIES;
PROVIDERS; MEMBERS OF THE EARLY CHILDHOOD WORKFORCE; LOCAL AND
TRIBAL AGENCIES; LOCAL GOVERNMENTS; ADMINISTRATIVE UNITS, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 22-20-103; HEAD START AGENCIES; FAMILY RESOURCE
CENTERS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26.5-3-102; COUNTY DEPARTMENTS OF
HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES; AND OTHER INTERESTED PERSONS WITHIN THE
COMMUNITY CONCERNING THE PERFORMANCE OF THE EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCIL.
(b) (I) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE COUNCIL IS NOT
MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE SCOPE OF WORK AND ACCOUNTABILITY
METRICS CONTAINED IN THE AGREEMENT, OR IS NOT PERFORMING AT THE
LEVEL REQUIRED TO SUCCESSFULLY IMPLEMENT THE COMMUNITY STRATEGIC
PLAN AND TO ENSURE THAT THE COMMUNITY SUBSTANTIALLY MEETS LOCAL
AND STATEWIDE GOALS FOR THE PROVISION OF EARLY CHILDHOOD AND
FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND SERVICES, THEN THE DEPARTMENT MAY
REQUIRE THE COUNCIL TO IMPLEMENT A PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE ONGOING TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE, SUPPORT, AND FEEDBACK TO THE COUNCIL AS THE COUNCIL
IMPLEMENTS A PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE COUNCIL HAS
FAILED TO MAKE SUBSTANTIAL PROGRESS TOWARD ADDRESSING THE ISSUES
IDENTIFIED IN THE PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN WITHIN THE TIME
FRAME IDENTIFIED IN THE PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TERMINATE THE
COUNCIL'S AGREEMENT. ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR SHALL ADOPT RULES GOVERNING THE PROCESS FOR TERMINATING
AN AGREEMENT.
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-019

(IV) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL
ADOPT RULES ESTABLISHING OBJECTIVE, MEASURABLE CRITERIA THAT THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL APPLY IN REQUIRING A COUNCIL TO IMPLEMENT A
PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN.
(2) IF A COUNCIL HAS FAILED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE
SCOPE OF WORK AND ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS CONTAINED IN THE
AGREEMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE BOARD OR BOARDS OF
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS THAT DESIGNATED THE CONVENING ENTITY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-2-203 (3). THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL
ADOPT RULES ADDRESSING THE PROCESS FOR A BOARD OR BOARDS OF
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS TO APPOINT A NEW CONVENING ENTITY IF THE
DEPARTMENT TERMINATES AN AGREEMENT DUE TO A COUNCIL'S
PERFORMANCE ISSUES. THE RULES MUST ALSO ADDRESS HOW, FOR ANY AREA
WITHIN THE STATE FOR WHICH A COUNCIL IS NOT ESTABLISHED, OR FOR
WHICH AN EXISTING COUNCIL IS NOT FULLY CAPABLE OF IMPLEMENTING ALL
ASPECTS OF THE COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT WILL
ENSURE, TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, CONTINUITY OF THE DELIVERY
OF SERVICES REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 FOR THE AREA, UNTIL A
COUNCIL IS ESTABLISHED OR AN EXISTING COUNCIL IS FULLY CAPABLE OF
IMPLEMENTING ALL ASPECTS OF THE COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN.
(3) BEGINNING IN JANUARY 2028, AND IN JANUARY EVERY YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS
PRESENTATION DURING ITS "SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY SECTION
2-7-203, INFORMATION CONCERNING COUNCILS' PROGRESS TOWARD
ACHIEVING ACCOUNTABILITY METRICS AS SHARED WITH THE DEPARTMENT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-2-206 (1)(f).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 26.5-2-208.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26.5-2-210 as
follows:
26.5-2-210. Transfer of functions - legislative intent.
(1) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT ON AND
AFTER JULY 1, 2026, THE STATEWIDE SYSTEM OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCILS IS RESPONSIBLE FOR EXECUTING, ADMINISTERING, PERFORMING,
AND ENFORCING THE RIGHTS, POWERS, DUTIES, FUNCTIONS, AND
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-019

OBLIGATIONS VESTED BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, IN THE LOCAL COORDINATING
ORGANIZATIONS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 2, AS
IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026.
(2) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE RIGHTS,
POWERS, DUTIES, FUNCTIONS, AND OBLIGATIONS CONCERNING SUPPORTING
ACCESS TO AND DELIVERY OF EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SUPPORT
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES ARE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATEWIDE SYSTEM OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
(3) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT ANY MONEY
THE DEPARTMENT ALLOCATES TO SUPPORT A TRANSITION PERIOD EXTENSION
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION BE A ONE-TIME EXPENDITURE
AND NOT BE A SOURCE OF ONGOING PROGRAM FUNDING OR A BASELINE
ADJUSTMENT.
(4) A LOCAL COORDINATING ORGANIZATION RETAINS THE RIGHTS,
POWERS, DUTIES, FUNCTIONS, AND OBLIGATIONS NECESSARY TO SATISFY THE
REQUIREMENTS OF A COORDINATOR AGREEMENT IN FORCE PRIOR TO JULY 1,
2026. AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL MAY SUBCONTRACT THE PROVISION
OF SERVICES DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 2 TO A LOCAL COORDINATING
ORGANIZATION THAT IS ESTABLISHED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, AND THAT IS
NOT ALSO AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL. AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL
MAY SUBCONTRACT THE PROVISION OF SERVICES DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 2,
INCLUDING AFTER JULY 1, 2026, IF THE SUBCONTRACTING IS CONSISTENT
WITH THE COUNCIL'S APPROVED AGREEMENT AND DEPARTMENT OVERSIGHT.
(5) THE RULES PERTAINING TO THE RIGHTS, POWERS, DUTIES,
FUNCTIONS, AND OBLIGATIONS TRANSFERRED TO THE STATEWIDE SYSTEM OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS THAT ARE ADOPTED BY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND ARE IN EFFECT AS OF JULY 1, 2026, CONTINUE IN EFFECT AND
APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT AND PERSONS PROVIDING THE SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 2 AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1,
2026, UNTIL REPLACED BY RULES ADOPTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027.
(6) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2026, UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED, IF
A PROVISION OF LAW REFERS TO A LOCAL COORDINATING ORGANIZATION
WITH REGARD TO THE RIGHTS, POWERS, DUTIES, FUNCTIONS, OR OBLIGATIONS
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE LAW IS CONSTRUED AS
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-019

REFERRING TO AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL.
(7) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS PART 2,
IF THE TRANSFER OF RIGHTS, DUTIES, FUNCTIONS, AND OBLIGATIONS
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES THE CONSOLIDATION, REASSIGNMENT,
OR MATERIAL MODIFICATION OF THE DUTIES OF AN ORGANIZATION
PROVIDING THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 2, AS IT
EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, OR AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE A ONE-TIME EXTENSION OF THE TRANSITION
PERIOD. THE TRANSITION PERIOD MUST CONCLUDE ON OR BEFORE JULY 1,
2029, AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO FURTHER EXTENSION.
(b) DURING A TRANSITION PERIOD EXTENSION AUTHORIZED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY,
AS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT THE ADMINISTRATION AND COORDINATION OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAMS AND SERVICES, MAINTAIN SEPARATE
CONTRACTS WITH AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL AND AN ORGANIZATION
PROVIDING THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 2, AS IT
EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026.
(c) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT A WRITTEN REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE. THE REPORT
MUST INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS OF TRANSITION COSTS AND EXPENDITURES,
OPERATIONAL READINESS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ANY LEGISLATIVE
CHANGES NECESSARY TO FACILITATE LOCAL EARLY CHILDHOOD SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION, COORDINATION, AND CONTRACTING FOLLOWING A
TRANSITION PERIOD AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-1-103, amend
(4) as follows:
26.5-1-103. Definitions.
As used in this title 26.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Local coordinating organization" means the entity selected by
the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-103 PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, to
implement a community plan for increasing access to, coordinating, and
allocating funding for early childhood and family support programs and
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-019

services within a specified community.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-1-105, amend
(2)(i) as follows:
26.5-1-105. Powers and duties of the executive director - rules
- rules advisory council - repeal.
(2) (i) In reviewing and making recommendations concerning rules
and in preparing other recommendations for the executive director, the
council shall strive to develop recommendations that are detailed and
measurable and consider the impacts on children, parents, families,
providers, school districts, counties, and local coordinating organizations
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS. The RULES ADVISORY council must approve
recommendations by a majority vote and provide those recommendations
to the executive director in writing. Members of the council voting in the
minority may submit a written explanation of their opposition to the
recommendations to the executive director.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-1-109, amend
(1)(i) as follows:
26.5-1-109. Department functions - operating principles.
(1) The department shall execute the following functions and
operate programs and provide services associated with those functions as
described in this title 26.5 and authorized by federal law:
(i) Collaborate with other state departments, local and tribal
agencies, and local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS
to safely collect and share data, eliminating duplication of data collection
when possible, while ensuring privacy and security for children and
families, to enable the department to gauge the statewide quality,
availability, capacity, and delivery of early childhood and family support
programs and services;
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-1-111, amend
(1) introductory portion and (2)(c) as follows:
26.5-1-111. Data system - collection - analysis - cross-agency
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-019

agreements.
(1) The department shall work with local coordinating organizations
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, state agencies, local and tribal agencies, and
providers, as necessary, to collect, share, manage, and protect qualitative
and quantitative data pertaining to early childhood and family support
programs and services. The department shall review and analyze the
collected data to assess:
(2) At a minimum, the department shall collect data pertaining to
early childhood and family support programs and services that includes:
(c) Information that enables the department, local coordinating
organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, and local and tribal agencies
to assess on a continuing basis the needs for early childhood and family
support programs and services in an area and make decisions concerning the
provision of programs and services;
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-1-112, amend
(1)(d) as follows:
26.5-1-112. Transition review - program review - report - repeal.
(1) (d) In conducting the reviews and making recommendations
pursuant to this subsection (1), the independent evaluator shall solicit input
through a process that includes participation by the populations served by
the programs; the providers and members of the workforce working in the
programs; local coordinating organizations; state, local, and tribal agencies
involved in implementing the programs; and any other relevant experts.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-109, amend
(4) as follows:
26.5-4-109. Provider rates - provider recruitment - provider.
(4) The department, working with early childhood councils as
defined in section 26.5-2-202 AND county departments, and local
coordinating organizations as defined in section 26.5-2-102 shall identify
and recruit providers throughout the state to participate in the child care
assistance program. In identifying and recruiting providers, the department
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-019

and local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS shall
establish a mixed delivery system of public and private providers in
communities throughout the state that enables parents to select CCCAP
providers for their children from as broad a range as possible within their
respective communities.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-111, amend
(11) and (12)(d) as follows:
26.5-4-111. Services - eligibility - assistance provided - waiting
lists - rules - exceptions from cooperating with child support
establishment.
(11) A provider or a local coordinating organization, as defined in
section 26.5-2-102 AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26.5-2-202, may accept a family's CCCAP application and submit it THE
APPLICATION to the county on behalf of a family seeking child care
assistance.
(12) Each county:
(d) May use its THE COUNTY'S CCCAP allocation to provide
enrollment contracts or grants to early care and education providers: To
support implementation of the local community plan described in section
26.5-2-104 APPLICABLE EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL COMMUNITY
STRATEGIC PLAN DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-2-204; to increase the supply
and improve the quality of child care for infants and toddlers, children with
disabilities, after-hours care, and children in underserved neighborhoods;
to provide stability for the early childhood sector; and to improve alignment
with the provision of additional preschool services, as defined in section
26.5-4-203, to working families who need additional care;
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-203, repeal (5)
and (11); and add (5.5) as follows:
26.5-4-203. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) "Community plan" means the community plan adopted by a local
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-019

coordinating organization pursuant to section 26.5-2-104.
(5.5) "EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL" MEANS AN EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCIL IDENTIFIED OR ESTABLISHED LOCALLY IN COMMUNITIES
THROUGHOUT THE STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-2-203.
(11) "Local coordinating organization" means the entity selected by
the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-103 to implement a community
plan for early childhood and family support programs and services within
a specified community.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-204, amend
(2) as follows:
26.5-4-204. Colorado universal preschool program - created -
eligibility - workforce development plan - program funding - rules.
(2) For the 2023-24 school year and each school year thereafter,
subject to the availability and enrollment capacity of preschool providers,
parents throughout the state may enroll their children, free of charge, in ten
hours per week of publicly funded preschool services for the school year
preceding the school year in which the children are eligible to enroll in
kindergarten. The department, working with local coordinating
organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, shall identify and recruit
preschool providers throughout the state to participate in the Colorado
universal preschool program. In identifying and recruiting preschool
providers, the department and local coordinating organizations EARLY
CHILDHOOD COUNCILS shall, to the extent practicable, establish a mixed
delivery system in communities throughout the state that enables parents to
select preschool providers for their children from as broad a range as
possible within their respective communities.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-205, amend
(1)(b)(I) as follows:
26.5-4-205. Quality standards - evaluation - support.
(1) (b) (I) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section,
the department shall ensure that each preschool provider that participates in
the preschool program meets the quality standards established by rule in
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-019

accordance with this section. The department may work with a local
coordinating organization AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL to ensure that a
preschool provider meets the quality standards. The department may
prohibit a preschool provider that fails to meet one or more of the quality
standards from participating in the preschool program.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-207, amend
(3) as follows:
26.5-4-207. Preschool program evaluation and improvement
process - independent evaluator.
(3) The department shall communicate the evaluations and
recommendations of the independent evaluator to families, communities,
preschool providers, local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCILS, the state board of education, and the general assembly, as
appropriate, to inform and improve early childhood teaching and education
and policy-making related to early childhood education.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-208, amend
(1)(c), (1)(e), (3)(a), (3)(c)(II), and (3)(c)(IV) as follows:
26.5-4-208. Preschool provider funding - per-child rates - local
contribution - distribution and use of money - definitions.
(1) (c) In establishing the formula for additional preschool services,
in addition to the considerations specified in subsection (1)(a) of this
section, the department may consider the amount of local funding available
to assist families within a community based on the community plan
APPLICABLE EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL COMMUNITY STRATEGIC PLAN
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-2-204 or available within an area that does not
have a local coordinating organization AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL. A
preschool provider is prohibited from charging a fee for additional
preschool services to a family that participates in the preschool program that
exceeds the amount charged to families that do not receive additional
preschool services.
(e) In establishing the formulas and other distribution amounts, the
department shall consult with the rules advisory council, the early childhood
leadership commission, and members of the early childhood community,
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-019

including parents of preschool-age children, preschool educators, preschool
providers, early childhood councils, school districts, charter schools,
representatives of county departments of human or social services, local
coordinating organizations, and individuals with financial expertise in
public and private funding sources for early childhood services.
(3) (a) Beginning in the 2023-24 fiscal year 2026-27 FISCAL YEAR
and for each fiscal year thereafter, the department, working with local
coordinating organizations as provided in each local coordinating
organization's coordinator agreement EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH EACH EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL'S AGREEMENT with
the department, shall distribute the funding appropriated to the department
for preschool services from the preschool programs cash fund and any
amount received pursuant to section 26.5-4-209 (2). The department and
local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, as
applicable, shall base the amounts distributed on the per-child rates and any
special purpose distributions established for the applicable fiscal year
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. At the start of each fiscal year, the
department and local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCILS, as applicable, shall distribute a portion of the funding to
preschool providers based on the numbers and types of eligible children
expected to enroll in preschool as estimated in the community STRATEGIC
plans or as estimated by the department for an area that does not have a
local coordinating organization AN EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL. The
department and local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD
COUNCILS, as applicable, shall continue distributing portions of the funding
periodically throughout the school year and shall adjust the amounts
distributed based on the actual numbers and types of eligible children
enrolled by preschool providers.
(c) (II) The department and local coordinating organizations EARLY
CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, as applicable, shall distribute the funding for
preschool services for children who are three years of age or younger as
described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section only to preschool
providers that are school districts or charter schools for the eligible children
who are three years of age and younger whom the school district or charter
school enrolls in accordance with the preschool program; except that, in a
fiscal year in which the general assembly specifically appropriates an
amount to provide preschool services for children three years of age or
younger who do not have disabilities that exceeds the amount described in
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-019

subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section, the department may distribute in
accordance with the applicable community plans STRATEGIC PLANS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-2-204 all or any portion of the excess
appropriation amount to community-based preschool providers. A school
district may distribute all or a portion of the amount received pursuant to
this subsection (3)(c)(II) to a head start agency or community-based
preschool provider that provides preschool services pursuant to a contract
with the school district.
(IV) In a fiscal year in which the amount described in subsection
(3)(c)(I)(B) of this section to fund preschool services for children who are
three years of age or younger is less than is required to fully fund the
number of said eligible children who actually enroll for preschool services,
the department shall first provide funding for the eligible children with
disabilities and eligible children who are in low-income families and meet
at least one qualifying factor and then provide funding for the remaining
eligible children who are in low-income families. If any amount of the
appropriation described in subsection (3)(c)(I)(B) of this section remains,
the department, working with the rules advisory council, the local
coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS, and any other
interested persons, shall establish the priority for distributing the funding
among the remaining eligible children.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-209, amend
(5) as follows:
26.5-4-209. Preschool programs cash fund - created - use.
(5) AFTER ENSURING THE DELIVERY OF DIRECT SERVICES FOR
ELIGIBLE CHILDREN, the department may use money appropriated from the
preschool programs cash fund for the administrative costs of local
coordinating organizations INCURRED BY EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS THAT
ARE DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE DELIVERY OF PRESCHOOL SERVICES.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-210, amend
(1) introductory portion, (1)(e), (1)(g)(VII), and (2) as follows:
26.5-4-210. Reporting.
(1) Beginning with the hearing held in January of 2025 As part of
PAGE 20-SENATE BILL 26-019

the annual hearing held pursuant to the "State Measurement for
Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act",
part 2 of article 7 of title 2, the department shall report on the
implementation and effectiveness of the Colorado universal preschool
program in the preceding fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must
include:
(e) The amount of funding distributed to preschool providers
through the preschool program, in total and disaggregated by communities
with local coordinating organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS and
areas of the state that do not have local coordinating organizations EARLY
CHILDHOOD COUNCILS;
(g) Of the amount appropriated from the preschool programs cash
fund, the amount, expressed as a dollar amount and a percentage of the total
appropriation, that:
(VII) Was spent on administrative expenses of the department and
each local coordinating organization EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCIL;
(2) The department may request and local coordinating
organizations EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS and preschool providers shall
provide information as necessary for the department to prepare the report
described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-101-105, amend
(1)(a)(XVII) as follows:
24-101-105. Application of this code.
(1) (a) This code applies to all publicly funded contracts entered into
by all governmental bodies of the executive branch of this state; except that
this code does not apply to:
(XVII) The department of early childhood in soliciting and selecting
APPROVING entities to serve as local coordinating organizations pursuant to
section 26.5-2-103 EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS PURSUANT TO SECTION
26.5-2-204 and coordinating agreements entered into pursuant to section
26.5-2-105 SECTION 26.5-2-206; or
PAGE 21-SENATE BILL 26-019

SECTION 25. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 26.5-4-203 (5) and (11), Colorado Revised Statutes, as
repealed in section 17 of this act, and section 26.5-4-208 (3)(a), (3)(c)(II),
and (3)(c)(IV), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 21 of this
act, take effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 26. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 22-SENATE BILL 26-019

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 23-SENATE BILL 26-019